Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 10. Rice Promotion Board

§ 69-10-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the growth and development of the rice industry in Mississippi by research, advertisement promotions and education and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 384, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-2.
Mississippi Rice Promotion Board; membership; organization and administration.

The Mississippi Rice Promotion Board is created, to be composed of twelve (12) members to be appointed by the Governor to serve terms of four (4) years, as hereinafter provided. All of the twelve (12) members of the board shall be producers of rice in the State of Mississippi. Within ten (10) days following March 9, 1995, the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., the Mississippi Rice Council for Market Development and the Delta Council shall each submit the names of six (6) rice producers to the Governor, and he shall appoint four (4) members from the nominees of each organization to serve on the board on rotating four-year terms. The original board shall be appointed with members of each of the aforenamed organizations appointed as follows: one (1) for one (1) year, one (1) for two (2) years, one (1) for three (3) years and one (1) for four (4) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of expiring board members, the aforenamed organizations shall submit the names of four (4) nominees to the Governor and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the Governor in the same manner, giving equal representation to each organization. Vacancies which occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment, and shall elect a chairman, vice chairman and secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by such officers or specifically designated by the board. The chairman, vice chairman and secretary-treasurer shall be bonded in an amount not less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). The cost of the bonds shall be paid from the funds received under the provisions of Section 69-10-1 et seq. Such bond shall be a security for any illegal act of such member of the board and recovery thereon may be had by the state for any injury by such illegal act of such member. The board may establish rules and regulations for its own government and the administration of the affairs of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 310, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 310, § 2, eff July 1, 1995.

[Laws, 1994, ch. 421, § 1]

HISTORY:
[Laws, 1981, ch. 284, § 2]

§ 69-10-5.
Assessment on rice grown in state; rice promotion fund; records and reports.

There is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of Two Cents (2¢) per bushel on all rice grown within the State of Mississippi; from and after July 1, 1991, the rate of assessment shall be increased by an additional One Cent (1¢) per bushel so that the total assessment equals Three Cents (3¢) per bushel. Such assessment shall be deducted by the purchaser from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state. Assessments on rice put under loan to the Commodity Credit Corporation or purchased by the Commodity Credit Corporation and delivered to it shall be payable when such rice is placed under loan or is purchased. The Commodity Credit Corporation may require deduction and payment of the assessment from the loan proceeds or from the purchase price on the behalf of the producer. Assessments on rice put under loan to the Commodity Credit Corporation and redeemed by the producer before the takeover date, if already paid by having been deducted from the loan proceeds shall not be deducted by each miller or handler from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale as provided in this section; otherwise, the assessment shall be deducted.

The assessment imposed and levied by this section shall be payable to and collected by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, hereafter referred to as “the department,” from the purchaser of such rice at the first point of sale or from the Commodity Credit Corporation as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The proceeds of the assessment collected by the department shall be deposited with the State Treasurer in a special fund, the “Mississippi Rice Promotion Fund,” and promptly remitted to a foundation under such terms and conditions as the Rice Promotion Board deems necessary to ensure that such assessments are used properly in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall submit to the Mississippi Rice Promotion Board a budget detailing and justifying the administrative costs of the department in administering the provisions of this chapter, and such budget must be approved by the Mississippi Rice Promotion Board by April 1 of each year. The department shall pay over to the Mississippi Rice Promotion Fund the funds collected, less an amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3-1/2%) of the gross amount collected. The amount withheld by the department must be approved by the Mississippi Rice Promotion Board by July 1 of each year. The payments to the Mississippi Rice Promotion Board shall be accompanied by a complete report of all funds collected and disbursed.

Each purchaser or the Commodity Credit Corporation shall keep a complete and accurate record of all rice handled by him and shall furnish each producer with a signed sales slip showing the number of bushels purchased from him and the amount deducted by him for the Mississippi Rice Promotion Fund. Such records shall be in such form and contain such other information as the department shall by rule or regulation prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the purchaser for a period of two (2) years and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon oral or written demand by the department or any duly authorized agent or representative thereof. Every purchaser or the Commodity Credit Corporation, at such time or times as the commissioner of the department may require, shall submit reports or other documentary information deemed necessary for the efficient and equitable collection of the assessment imposed in this chapter. The department shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any purchaser of rice and examine or cause to be examined by such agent, only books, papers and records which deal in any way with respect to the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 384, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 315; Laws, 1987, ch. 452, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 307 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 563, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 421, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 435, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2008, ch. 400, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011.).

§ 69-10-7.
Penalties; exemption.

Any purchaser who fails to file a report or to pay any assessment within the time required by the department shall forfeit to the department a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due, plus one percent (1%) of such amount for each month of delay or fraction thereof after the first month after such report was required to be filed or such assessment became due. The penalty shall be paid to the department and shall be disposed of by it in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed herein.

The department shall collect the penalties levied herein, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

By voluntary payment by the person liable.

By legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Any person required to collect the assessment provided for in this chapter who fails to remit same or who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises, or such books, records or other documents relating to the liability of such person for the assessment herein imposed, or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent such inspection, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or less bushels of rice in any calendar year, provided he is not regularly engaged in the purchase of rice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 384, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 563, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-9.
Expenditure of funds; report of expenditures; penalty for failure to report.

The Mississippi Rice Promotion Board shall plan and conduct a program of research, education and advertising designed to promote the rice industry in Mississippi. The board is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessment imposed herein for these purposes, including basic administration expenses of the plan; provided, however, that the avails of the additional One Cent (1¢) assessment imposed from and after July 1, 1991, shall be expended solely for programs of research to promote further development of the rice industry in this state. Use of these funds may be applied, as prescribed in this section, within or without the State of Mississippi, including regional, national and international research and promotional applications.

The Mississippi Legislature finds and declares that the factors which affect the ability of Mississippi rice farmers to market their crop are established by national and international forces in the world market. The Legislature further finds and declares that the expenditure of funds by the board for the purpose of influencing the development and implementation of national and international policy affecting the marketing of rice produced by Mississippi farmers is the expenditure of funds for a public purpose.

The board may expend a portion of the funds received and administered by the board for the purpose of influencing the development and implementation of national and international policy affecting the marketing of rice produced by Mississippi farmers.

The amount of funds expended by the board in each fiscal year for the purposes authorized in this subsection shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the budget of the board for that fiscal year.

The board shall not expend any funds for the purpose of influencing any political activity.

A report of all expenditures shall be made annually on December 31, with four (4) copies of the report to be filed and presented during regular sessions of the Mississippi Legislature with each of the following: the Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the State Auditor.

If the board fails to make an annual report in violation of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the board shall be subject to a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 384, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 307 § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 421, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-11.
Provisions to be controlling.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling to the extent of the conflict.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 384, § 6; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-13.
State Tax Commission to assist department in collecting assessments.

The State Tax Commission shall provide any information necessary to assist the Department of Agriculture and Commerce in collecting the assessments provided for in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 563, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-10-15.
Commissioner authorized to audit Rice Promotion Board; information to be included in audit; injunction for violations of chapter.

The commissioner may conduct an audit of the board to verify compliance with any rules and regulations promulgated for the efficient enforcement of this chapter.

Under this section, the audited board shall provide information to the commissioner that verifies the amounts received and expended from the fees assessed and collected by the department and remitted to the board. Records maintained in the course of the normal conduct of business by the board may serve as verification.

The commissioner may apply for and the court may grant a temporary or permanent injunction on disbursements made to the board from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2009.